Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.346

Doing business without registration.

A foreign limited liability company doing business in this state without registering with the secretary of state is subject to RCW 23.95.505.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7122; 2015 c 188 s 68.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.